Utah statutes.
70A-8-401.    Duty of issuer to register transfer.

(1)  If a certificated security in registered form is presented to an issuer with a request to register transfer or an instruction is presented to an issuer with a request to register transfer of an uncertificated security, the issuer shall register the transfer as requested if:

(a)  under the terms of the security the person seeking registration of transfer is eligible to have the security registered in its name;

(b)  the indorsement or instruction is made by the appropriate person or by an agent who has actual authority to act on behalf of the appropriate person;

(c)  reasonable assurance is given that the indorsement or instruction is genuine and authorized as provided in Section 70A-8-402;

(d)  any applicable law relating to the collection of taxes has been complied with;

(e)  the transfer does not violate any restriction on transfer imposed by the issuer in accordance with Section 70A-8-204;

(f)  a demand that the issuer not register transfer has not become effective under Section 70A-8-403, or the issuer has complied with Subsection 70A-8-403(2) but no legal process or indemnity bond is obtained as provided in Subsection 70A-8-403(4); and

(g)  the transfer is in fact rightful or is to a protected purchaser.

(2)  If an issuer is under a duty to register a transfer of a security, the issuer is liable to a person presenting a certificated security or an instruction for registration or to the person's principal for loss resulting from unreasonable delay in registration or failure or refusal to register the transfer.

